Hawaii statutes.
§291-35.1 Regulation of bumper
height. Maximum bumper heights of motor vehicles shall be determined by
the weight category of gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) as measured from a
level surface to the highest point on the bottom of the bumper. Maximum heights
are as follows:

Gross Vehicle Weight Rating Front Rear

Passenger vehicles 22 inches 22 inches

4,500 lbs. and under 29 inches 29
inches

4,501 lbs. to 7,500 lbs. 33 inches 33
inches

7,501 lbs. to 10,000 lbs. 35 inches 35
inches

For any vehicle with bumpers or attaching
components which have been modified or altered from the original manufacturer's
design to conform with the maximum bumper height requirements of this section,
the bumper height shall be measured from a level surface to the bottom of the
bumper. The vehicle frame rail, measured from a level surface to the bottom of
the vehicle frame rail, shall not exceed the attached bumper height. The
maximum distance between vehicle body to vehicle frame rail shall not exceed
three inches. The distance between the vehicle body to vehicle frame rail
shall be measured from the vehicle body mount seat to the vehicle frame rail
mount seat. "Bumper", for purposes of this section means a
horizontal load bearing protective system installed on a motor vehicle which is
constructed of sturdy materials that will not shatter or split upon moderate
impact and provides adequate protection against damages to the front and rear
external lighting and reflective devices, hood, trunk, doors, painted surfaces,
cooling system, exhaust system, and other components during a low speed
impact. Any vehicle that exceeds the Vehicle Equipment Safety Commission - Regulation
12 recommended bumper height, based on the gross vehicle weight rating, shall
be equipped with an audible reverse warning system. The audible reverse
warning system is not required on any open cab vehicle with a distance of less
than four feet from the rear of the driver's seating position to the rear most
part of the vehicle body. [L 1984, c 291, §1; am L 1985, c 122, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next